Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1536YH (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 4 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 147.165 Health benefit plans ââ 1 claims. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 5 514J.102. 6 b. âHealth benefit planâ means a policy, contract, 7 certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health carrier 8 to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of 9 the costs of health care services. 10 c. âHealth care professionalâ means a physician or other 11 health care practitioner licensed, accredited, registered, or 12 certified to perform specified health care services consistent 13 with state law. 14 d. âHealth care servicesâ means the same as defined in 15 section 514J.102. 16 e. âPersonal representativeâ means the same as described in 17 45 C.F.R. Â§164.502(g). 18 2. A health care professional who provides health 19 care services to a covered person shall submit a claim for 20 reimbursement to the primary health benefit plan designated 21 by the covered person or the covered personâs personal 22 representative prior to submitting a claim for reimbursement to 23 any other health benefit plan designated by the covered person 24 or the covered personâs personal representative. 25 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514A.16 Explanation of benefits ââ 26 secondary health benefit plans. 27 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 28 requires: 29 a. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 30 514J.102. 31 b. âExplanation of benefitsâ means a statement provided to a 32 covered person by the covered personâs health benefit plan that 33 explains the costs that the health benefit plan will cover for 34 the health care services received by the covered person. 35 -1- LSB 1536YH (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 4 c. âHealth benefit planâ means a policy, contract, 1 certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health carrier 2 to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of 3 the costs of health care services. 4 d. âHealth care servicesâ means the same as defined in 5 section 514J.102. 6 e. âPersonal representativeâ means the same as described in 7 45 C.F.R. Â§164.502(g). 8 2. If a covered person, a covered personâs personal 9 representative, or a covered personâs secondary health benefit 10 plan request a copy of an explanation of benefits from a 11 covered personâs primary health benefit plan, the primary 12 health benefit plan shall provide a copy of the explanation of 13 benefits no later than thirty calendar days from the date of 14 the request. 15